Utah statutes.
67-16-14.   Unethical transactions -- Duty to dismiss officer or employee -- Right to rescind or void contract.

If any transaction is entered into in violation of Section 67-16-6, 67-16-7, or 67-16-8, the state, political subdivision, or agency involved:

(1)  shall dismiss the public officer or public employee who knowingly and intentionally violates this chapter from employment or office as provided by law; and

(2)  may rescind or void any contract or subcontract entered into in respect to such transaction without returning any part of the consideration that the state, political subdivision, or agency  has received.

